Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 18 Community Colleges

Revision of article. —

This article was revised by Laws 1985, ch. 208. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Cross references. —

As to giving instruction in constitutions and passing test for degree, see §§

21-9-102

,

21-9-103

.

As to selection of tuition-free students to community colleges by county commissioners, see §

21-17-105

.

As to agreements with university of Wyoming for joint operation, services and credit for collegiate work, see §

21-17-108

.

As to Wyoming public television council, see §

21-23-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities § 1.

14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities § 5.